Utah statutes.
62A-5-205.   State Board of Education -- Education of children at developmental center.

(1)  The State Board of Education is responsible for the education of school-aged children at the  developmental center.

(2)  In order to fulfill its responsibility under Subsection (1), the State Board of Education shall, where feasible, contract with local school districts or other appropriate agencies to provide educational and related administrative services.

(3)  Medical, residential, and other services that are not the responsibility of the State Board of Education or other state agencies are the responsibility of the division.

